Hawaii statutes.
§383-106 What reciprocal arrangements
authorized. (a) The department of labor and industrial relations may
enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate and duly authorized
agencies of other states or of the federal government, or both, whereby:

(1) Multistate employment. Services performed by an
individual for a single employing unit for which services are customarily
performed in more than one state shall be deemed to be services performed
entirely within any one of the states:

(A) In which any part of the individual's
service is performed;

(B) In which the individual has the
individual's residence; or

(C) In which the employing unit maintains a
place of business; provided there is in effect, as to such services, an
election, approved by the agency charged with the administration of the state's
unemployment compensation law, pursuant to which all the services performed by
the individual for the employing unit are deemed to be performed entirely
within the state;

(2) Accumulated benefit rights. Potential rights to
benefits accumulated under the unemployment compensation laws of one or more
states or under one or more such laws of the federal government, or both, may
constitute the basis for payment of benefits through a single appropriate agency
under terms which the department finds will be fair and reasonable as to all
affected interests and will not result in any substantial loss to the fund;

(3) Insured work. Wages or services, upon the basis
of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under an unemployment
compensation law of another state or of the federal government, shall be deemed
to be wages for insured work for the purpose of determining the individual's
rights to benefits under this chapter, and wages for insured work, on the basis
of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under this chapter shall
be deemed to be wages or services on the basis of which unemployment
compensation under such law of another state or of the federal government is
payable, but no such arrangement shall be entered into unless it contains
provisions for reimbursements to the fund for such of the benefits paid under
this chapter upon the basis of such wages or services and provisions for
reimbursements from the fund for such of the compensation paid under such other
law upon the basis of wages for insured work, as the department finds will be
fair and reasonable as to all affected interests; and

(4) Payment of contributions. Contributions due
under this chapter with respect to wages for insured work shall for the
purposes of sections 383-61 to 383-75 of this chapter be deemed to have been
paid to the fund as of the date payment was made as contributions therefor
under another state or federal unemployment compensation law, but no such
arrangement shall be entered into unless it contains provisions for such
reimbursement to the fund of such contributions and the actual earnings thereon
as the department finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected
interests.

(b) The provisions of subsection (a)(2) of
this section and of section 383-107 notwithstanding, the department of labor
and industrial relations shall participate in any arrangements for the payment
of compensation on the basis of combining an individual's wages and employment
covered under this chapter with the individual's wages and employment covered
under the unemployment compensation laws of other states which are approved by
the United States Secretary of Labor in consultation with the state
unemployment compensation agencies as reasonably calculated to assure the
prompt and full payment of compensation in such situations and which include
provisions for:

(1) Applying the base period of a single state law to
a claim involving the combining of an individual's wages and employment covered
under two or more state unemployment compensation laws; and

(2) Avoiding the duplicate use of wages and
employment by reason of such combining. [L 1939, c 219, §17; am L 1941, c 304,
§1, pt of subs 37; RL 1945, §4294; RL 1955, §93-105; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27;
HRS §383-106; am L 1971, c 187, §10; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) Subsection
(a)(1)(A), "or" deleted and punctuation changed;

(2) Subsection
(a)(1)(B), punctuation changed; and

(3) Subsection
(b)(1), punctuation changed.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next